Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,218
Bonds or insurance of Director of Banking and Finance as receiver of insolvent banks; premium; payment by state.

The State of Nebraska shall pay all premiums on bonds or equivalent commercial insurance policies that the Director of Banking and Finance may be required to give as receiver of insolvent state banks.

Laws 1930, Spec. Sess., c. 8, § 3, p. 39;

C.S.1929, § 20-2233;

R.S.1943, § 24-336;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-336;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 15.